Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.010

Divulging telegram.

Every person who shall wrongfully obtain or attempt to obtain, any knowledge of a telegraphic message, by connivance with the clerk, operator, messenger, or other employee of a telegraph company, and every clerk, operator, messenger, or other employee of such company who shall willfully divulge to any but the person for whom it was intended, any telegraphic message or dispatch intrusted to him or her for transmission or delivery, or the nature or contents thereof, or shall willfully refuse, neglect, or delay duly to transmit or deliver the same, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 323; 1909 c 249 s 410; Code 1881 s 2342; RRS s 2662.]

NOTES:

Intercepting, delaying telegram: RCW 9A.48.070, 9A.48.080.